Washington statutes.
RCW 19.60.042

Report to chief law enforcement officer—Precious metal dealers.

If the applicable chief of police or the county's chief law enforcement officer has compiled and published a list of persons who have been convicted of any crime involving theft, then a secondhand precious metal dealer shall utilize such a list for any transaction involving property other than property consisting of a precious metal as required by the applicable chief of police or the county's chief law enforcement officer.

[ 2011 c 289 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 289: See note following RCW 19.60.010.